Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 7. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 37.05.800.
Restriction on use of state money for residential contracting.

The state may not grant or loan money or purchase a loan for the construction or alteration of a privately-owned residential structure of one to four units unless the grant or loan requires the construction or alteration to be undertaken by a residential contractor with an endorsement issued under AS 08.18. In this subsection, “alteration” means changes that have a value greater than 25 percent of the value of the structure being altered.

The restriction of (a) of this section does not apply to a state loan or grant or purchase of a loan made for work described in AS

08.18.161

that is exempt from the requirements of AS 08.18.

History.

(§ 10 ch 99 SLA 1990)

Cross references. —

For provisions prohibiting state agency expenditure of funds to implement the requirements of the federal REAL ID Act of 2005, see AS

44.99.040

.